Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-502.01
Praecipe for summons.

The plaintiff shall file with the clerk of the court a praecipe for summons stating the name and address of each party to be served and the manner of service for each party. Upon written request of the plaintiff, separate or additional summonses shall be issued.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 19;

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 20.